en: Stretch level: High stretch; Low stretch; Moderate stretch; No stretch; Other
lt-LT: Tamprumo lygis: Didelis tamprumas; Mažas tamprumas; Vidutinis tamprumas; Netamprus; Kita
el: Επίπεδο ελαστικότητας: Υψηλή ελαστικότητα; Χαμηλή ελαστικότητα; Μέτρια ελαστικότητα; Καθόλου ελαστικότητα; Άλλο
nl: Stretch niveau: Veel stretch; Weinig stretch; Gemiddelde stretch; Geen stretch; Overig
zh-TW: 彈性程度: 高彈性; 低彈性; 中彈性; 無彈性; 其他
hu: Rugalmassági szint: Erősen nyúló; Kicsit nyúló; Közepesen nyúló; Nem nyúló; Egyéb
pl: Poziom rozciągliwości: Wysoka elastyczność; Niska elastyczność; Średnia elastyczność; Brak elastyczności; Inne
nb: Strekknivå: Mye stretch; Lite stretch; Moderat stretch; Ingen stretch; Annet
de: Dehnungsgrad: Stark dehnbar; Leicht dehnbar; Mäßig dehnbar; Nicht dehnbar; Andere
sv: Töjbarhetsnivå: Hög stretch; Låg stretch; Måttlig stretch; Ingen stretch; Övrigt
pt-PT: Nível de elasticidade: Elevada elasticidade; Baixa elasticidade; Elasticidade moderada; Sem elasticidade; Outro
fr: Degré d’extensibilité: Très extensible; Peu extensible; Modérément extensible; Non extensible; Autre
ja: ストレッチレベル: 高ストレッチ; 低ストレッチ; 中ストレッチ; ストレッチなし; その他
es: Nivel de estiramiento: Alta elasticidad; Baja elasticidad; Elasticidad moderada; Sin elasticidad; Otro
bg-BG: Ниво на разтягане: Висока еластичност; Ниска еластичност; Умерена еластичност; Без еластичност; Друго
sl-SI: Stopnja raztegljivosti: Zelo raztegljivo; Malo raztegljivo; Srednje raztegljivo; Neraztegljivo; Drugo
ru: Степень растяжимости: Высокая эластичность; Низкая эластичность; Средняя эластичность; Не тянется; Другое
pt-BR: Elasticidade nível: Alta elasticidade; Baixa elasticidade; Elasticidade moderada; Sem elasticidade; Outro
fi: Joustavuustaso: Erittäin joustava; Vähän joustava; Kohtalaisesti joustava; Ei joustoa; Muu
cs: Úroveň natažení: Vysoká elasticita; Nízká elasticita; Mírná elasticita; Bez elasticity; Jiné
ro-RO: Grad de elasticitate: Elasticitate ridicată; Elasticitate redusă; Elasticitate moderată; Fără elasticitate; Altele
vi: Mức độ kéo giãn: Độ giãn cao; Độ giãn thấp; Độ giãn vừa; Không co giãn; Khác
tr: Esneme seviyesi: Yüksek esneklik; Düşük esneklik; Orta esneklik; Esnek değil; Diğer
hr-HR: Razina rastezanja: Visoka rastezljivost; Niska rastezljivost; Umjerena rastezljivost; Nema rastezljivosti; Ostalo
ko: 신축 수준: 고신축; 저신축; 중간 신축; 신축성 없음; 기타
sk-SK: Úroveň pružnosti: Vysoká elasticita; Nízka elasticita; Stredná elasticita; Bez elasticity; Iné
zh-CN: 弹力等级: 高弹力; 低弹力; 中弹力; 无弹力; 其他
da: Strækniveau: Meget strækbar; Lidt strækbar; Moderat strækbar; Uden stræk; Andet
th: ระดับการยืด: ยืดได้มาก; ยืดได้น้อย; ยืดได้ปานกลาง; ไม่ยืดหยุ่น; อื่นๆ
it: Livello di allungamento: Elevata elasticità; Bassa elasticità; Media elasticità; Nessuna elasticità; Altro